District of Columbia statutes.
11-1914

Preservation of records.

(a)

All records and lists compiled and maintained in connection with the selection and service of jurors shall be preserved for the length of time specified in the jury system plan.

(b)

The contents of any records or lists used in connection with the selection process shall not be disclosed, except in connection with the preparation or presentation of a motion under § 11-1910, or until all individuals selected to serve as grand or petit jurors from such lists have been discharged.

Nov. 14, 1986, 100 Stat. 3635, Pub. L. 99-650, § 2
This section is referenced in § 16-5102.
1981 Ed., § 11-1914.
Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 11-1901.